Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 82. Practical Nursing Education

§ 2651.
Purpose of chapter.

The purposes of this chapter are to assist existing schools for practical nursing and to assist in the establishment of a school or schools for practical nursing under the direction of the Board of Trustees of the Vermont State College system.

HISTORY:

Added

1957, No. 273

, § 1; amended

1993, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2652.
Bylaws and regulations.

The Board of Trustees of the Vermont State Colleges shall make bylaws and regulations, consistent with the policies and regulations of the Vermont State Board of Nursing, to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1957, No. 273

, § 2;

1961, No. 184

, § 3, eff. June 28, 1961;

1993, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2653.
Appropriations.

Hereafter funds for the continuation of the program under this chapter shall be requested as a part of the operational budget of the Vermont State Colleges.

HISTORY:

Added

1957, No. 273

, § 3; amended

1959, No. 121

, § 1;

1961, No. 95

, § 1;

1993, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2654.
Consultant services by Department of Health.

The Department of Health may furnish consultant services as requested by the Vermont State College Board of Trustees in connection with this chapter.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 95

, § 2; amended

1993, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.